Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-912
Joint power plant; operation and extension; tax.

The city councils or village boards of trustees of the cities of the second class or villages issuing joint bonds under section 17-911 shall levy annually a sufficient tax to maintain and operate and extend the power plant, electric or other light work and to provide for the payment of interest on, and principal of, any bonds that may have been issued as provided in section 17-911.

Laws 1921, c. 192, § 2, p. 713;

C.S.1922, § 4395;

C.S.1929, § 17-602;

R.S.1943, § 17-912;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 248.